apertium-eo-en.en.dix
<pardef n="/be_able_to__vbmod">
<e>                           <p><l>be<b/>able<b/>to</l>    <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>are<b/>able<b/>to</l>   <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>am<b/>able<b/>to</l>    <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is<b/>able<b/>to</l>    <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>   <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was<b/>able<b/>to</l>   <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>were<b/>able<b/>to</l>  <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>been<b/>able<b/>to</l>  <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>being<b/>able<b/>to</l> <r>be<b/>able<b/>to<s n="vbmod"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>
<pardef n="ha/ve__vbhaver">
<e>                           <p><l>ve</l>                  <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ve</l>                  <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL">                    <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ving</l>                <r>ve<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/o__vaux">
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oes</l>                 <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>id</l>                  <r>o<s n="vbdo"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/be__vbser">
<e>                           <p><l>be</l>                  <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>are</l>                 <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>am</l>                  <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was</l>                 <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was</l>                 <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>were</l>                <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>been</l>                <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>being</l>               <r>be<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/be__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>be</l>                  <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>are</l>                 <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>am</l>                  <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>is</l>                  <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was</l>                 <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>was</l>                 <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>were</l>                <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>been</l>                <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>being</l>               <r>be<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ha/ve__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ve</l>                  <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ve</l>                  <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>d</l>                   <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ving</l>                <r>ve<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="d/o__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>o</l>                   <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oes</l>                 <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>id</l>                  <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>one</l>                 <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>oing</l>                <r>o<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="accept__vblex">
<!--
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
-->
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l></l>                    <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>s</l>                   <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ed</l>                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ing</l>                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="capsi/ze__vblex">
<e>                           <p><l>ze</l>                  <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>ze</l>                  <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>zes</l>                 <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>zed</l>                 <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>zed</l>                 <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
<e>                           <p><l>zing</l>                <r>ze<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="be born">              <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>born</l><r><g><b/>born</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be worth">             <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>worth</l><r><g><b/>worth</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be missing">           <i></i><par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>missing</l><r><g><b/>missing</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="be hungry">            <par n="/be__vblex"/><p><l><b/>hungry</l><r><g><b/>hungry</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="there is"><p><l>there<b/></l><r><g>there<b/></g></r></p><par n="/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="there is">             <i>there<b/></i><par n="/be__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="add up">               <i>add</i><par n="accept__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="appear">               <i>appear</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="attest">               <i>attest</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="be">                   <par n="/be__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="blind">                <i>blind</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="camp">                 <i>camp</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="capsize">              <i>capsi</i><par n="capsi/ze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="click">                <i>click</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="condition">            <i>condition</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="contrast">             <i>contrast</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="do">                   <i>d</i><par n="d/o__vaux"/></e>
<e lm="do">                   <i>d</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="debut">                <i>debut</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="detect">               <i>detect</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drown">                <i>drown</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="except">               <i>except</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fatten">               <i>fatten</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="found">                <i>found</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="have got">             <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/><p><l><b/>got</l><r><g><b/>got</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="have">                 <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vbhaver"/></e>
<e lm="have">                 <i>ha</i><par n="ha/ve__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hammer">               <i>hammer</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="imprison">             <i>imprison</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="interrupt">            <i>interrupt</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="lean">                 <i>lean</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="maintain">             <i>maintain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="neglect">              <i>neglect</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="part">                 <i>part</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="point">                <i>point</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pump">                 <i>pump</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="remain">               <i>remain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="restart">              <i>restart</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="round off">            <i>round</i><par n="accept__vblex"/><p><l><b/>off</l><r><g><b/>off</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="shift">                <i>shift</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="start">                <i>start</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="suspect">              <i>suspect</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tour">                 <i>tour</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="visit">                <i>visit</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="accord">               <i>accord</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="blunt">                <i>blunt</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="co-exist">             <i>co-exist</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="daunt">                <i>daunt</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="drain">                <i>drain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="fetter">               <i>fetter</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="gulp">                 <i>gulp</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="inter">                <i>inter</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="molest">               <i>molest</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="pinpoint">             <i>pinpoint</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="recoil">               <i>recoil</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="retain">               <i>retain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sicken">               <i>sicken</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="stain">                <i>stain</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="thread">               <i>thread</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="undo">                 <i>und</i><par n="d/o__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="wallop">               <i>wallop</i><par n="accept__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="be over">              <i></i><par n="/be__vbser"/><p><l><b/>over</l><r><g><b/>over</g></r></p></e>
